Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-905
Agency; rules and regulations; availability required; price.

Each agency shall make copies of the rules and regulations in force and effect for such agency available to all interested persons on request, at a price fixed to cover costs of publication and mailing, except that any such agency may furnish the same without charge if funds are available. No rule or regulation shall be effective unless copies thereof are available for distribution by the agency to persons requesting the same.

Laws 1945, c. 255, § 5, p. 795;

Laws 1947, c. 350, § 4, p. 1099;

Laws 1967, c. 618, § 2, p. 2071;

Laws 1969, c. 837, § 2, p. 3161;

Laws 1973, LB 134, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 253, § 4.